North Dakota, session 69, SB2011.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the
highway patrol for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the highway patrol, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Highway patrol $68,085,546 $14,653,962 $82,739,508
New and vacant FTE pool 0 2,445,122 2,445,122
Total all funds $68,085,546 $17,099,084 $85,184,630
Less other funds 20,428,226 6,251,313 26,679,539
Total general fund $47,657,320 $10,847,771 $58,505,091
Full-time equivalent positions 205.00 0.00 205.00
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total
Motor pool costs $3,705,000 $278,000 $3,983,000
Conductive electronic weapon replacement 0 870,000 870,000
Emergency operations course resurface 0 260,000 260,000
Preliminary breath test devices 0 50,000 50,000
Gun replacement 0 200,000 200,000
Federal grant authority 0 480,000 480,000
Crash assistance position 0 194,000 194,000
Total $3,705,000 $2,332,000 $6,037,000
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The
highway patrol may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item in section 1
of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the new and
vacant FTE pool line item to the highway patrol line item in accordance with the guidelines and
reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth legislative
assembly.
SECTION 4. OTHER FUNDS - TRANSFER - HIGHWAY TAX DISTRIBUTION FUND. The other
funds line item in section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $12,836,056, or so much of the sum as may
be necessary, from the state highway tax distribution fund which may be transferred at the direction of
the superintendent of the highway patrol for defraying the expenses of the highway patrol during the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.

S. B. NO. 2011 - PAGE 2
SECTION 5. OTHER FUNDS - MOTOR CARRIER ELECTRONIC PERMIT FUND. The other funds
line item in section 1 of this Act includes $3,419,828 from the motor carrier electronic permit transaction
fund for defraying various expenses associated with the issuance of permits and other nonenforcement
motor carrier and administrative activities during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2027.
SECTION 6. PAYMENTS TO HIGHWAY PATROL OFFICERS. Each patrol officer of the state
highway patrol is entitled to receive from funds appropriated in section 1 of this Act an amount not to
exceed $200 per month, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The
payments are in lieu of reimbursement for meals and other expenses, except lodging, while in travel
status within the state of North Dakota or while at the patrol officers' respective home stations. The
amounts must be paid at the time and in the same manner as salaries are paid to members of the
highway patrol and may be paid without the presentation of receipts or other memorandums.
SECTION 7. EXEMPTION - UNEXPENDED APPROPRIATIONS. The sum of $45,000 appropriated
from the motor carrier electronic permit transaction fund for technology enhancements in section 1 of
chapter 11 of the 2023 Session Laws is not subject to the provisions of section 54-44.1-11 and any
unexpended funds may be continued into the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30,
2027.

S. B. NO. 2011 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2011.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State